dictionaries/pt_BR/hyph_pt_BR.dic
o2s1b2
ó2s1b2
o2s1c2
ó2s1c2
o2s1d2
o2s1f2
ó2s1f2
o2s1g2
ó2s1g2
o2s1l2
o2s1m2
ó2s1m2
o2s1n2
ó2s1n2
o2s1p2
ó2s1p2
o2s1q4
ó2s1q4
o2s1r2
o2s1t2
o2s1v2
o2s3s2
ó2s3s2
ó2s3t2
o2u
o2x1b2
o2x1c2
o2x1d2
o2x1f2
o2x1m2
o2x1n2
o2x1p2
o2x1s2
o2x1t2
o2x1v2
o2z1m2
o2z1n2
o2z1r2
o2z1z2
ó3b2
ó3c2
o3c2a
o3c2á
o3c2â
o3c2ã
o3c2e
o3c2é
o3c2ê
o3c2i
o3c2í
o3c2o
o3c2ó
o3c2ô
o3c2õ
o3c2u
o3c2ú
o3c2y
o3c4h2
o3c4l2
o3c4r2
o3d2
ó3d2
o3f2
ó3f2
o3h2
o3j2
o3o
o3ó
o3õ4
o3p2
ó3p2
ó3q4
ó3r2
o3t2
ó3t2
o3v2
ó3v2
o4c3c2
o4c3ç2
o4c3d2
o4c3f2
o4c3k2
o4c3m2
o4c3n2
o4c3q2
o4c3s2
o4c3t2
o4l.
ó4l.
o4r.
o4s.
ó4s.
o4x.
o4z.
p2é3n4
p2e4m.
p2e4n6s.
q4ú1e4m.
q4ú1e4n6s.
q4u2é2n4s
q4u2e4m.
q4u2e4n6s.
q4u6á
q4u6ã
q4u6é
q4u6ê
q4u6í
r1s2a
r1s2á
r1s2â
r1s2ã
r1s2e
r1s2é
r1s2ê
r1s2i
r1s2í
r1s2o
r1s2ó
r1s2ô
r1s2u
r1s2ú
r1s4h2
r1x
r2ã
r2a1i1n2o
r2a1i1n2ó
r2a1i2n3d2
r2a1i2n3f2
r2a1i2n3t2
r2a1i3n2a
r2a1i3n2i
r2a1i3n2ú
r2a1i3p2
r2a1i3q2
r2a1i3r2
r2a2i.
r2a2i3a
r2a2i3á
r2a2i3ã
r2a2i3b2
r2a2i3c2
r2a2i3d2
r2a2i3e
r2a2i3g2
r2a2i3í
r2a2i3le
r2a2i3lh2
r2a2i3li
r2a2i3lu
r2a2i3m2
r2a2i3ne
r2a2i3t2
r2a2i3v2
r2a2i3x2
r2a2i4l3g2
r2a2i4l3l2
r2a2i4l3m2
r2a2l3b2
r2a2l3c2
r2a2l3d2
r2a2l3f2
r2a2l3g
r2a2l3l
r2a2l3m2
r2a2l3n2
r2a2l3q4
r2a2l3s2
r2a2l3t2
r2a2l3v2
r2a2m3b2
r2a2m3m2
r2a2m3n2
r2a2m3p2
r2a2m3s
r2a2n3c2
r2a2n3d2
r2a2n3f2
r2a2n3g2
r2a2n3j2
r2a2n3k2
r2a2n3l2
r2a2n3n2
r2a2n3q4
r2a2n3s
r2a2n3t2
r2a2n3v2
r2a2n3x
r2a2n3z
r2a2n4s.
r2a2r.
r2a2s3b2
r2a2s3c2
r2a2s3d2
r2a2s3f2
r2a2s3g2
r2a2s3l2
r2a2s3m2
r2a2s3n2
r2a2s3p2
r2a2s3q4
r2a2s3s2
r2a2s3t2
r2a2s3v2
r2a2t3s2
r2a2t3t2
r2a2t3z2
r2a2u3a
r2a2u3á
r2a2u3b2
r2a2ú3b2
r2a2u3c2
r2a2u3d2
r2a2ú3d2
r2a2u3e
r2a2u3é
r2a2u3ê
r2a2u3g2
r2a2u3i
r2a2u3í
r2a2u3j2
r2a2ú3j2
r2a2u3l2
r2a2u3m2
r2a2u3n2
r2a2u3p2
r2a2u3q4
r2a2u3r
r2a2ú3r
r2a2u3s
r2a2ú3s
r2a2u3t2
r2a2u3v2
r2a2ú3v2
r2a2u3x2
r2a2u3z2
r2a2y3b2
r2a3a
r2a3á
r2a3â
r2a3ã
r2a3b2
r2a3c2
r2a3d2
r2a3e
r2a3é
r2a3ê
r2a3f2
r2a3g2
r2a3h2
r2a3í1
r2a3i1n4h2
r2a3i2l.
r2a3i2o
r2a3i2ó
r2a3i2u
r2a3i2ú
r2a3i2z
r2a3i4s.
r2a3j2
r2a3l2a
r2a3l2á
r2a3l2â
r2a3l2ã
r2a3l2e
r2a3l2é
r2a3l2ê
r2a3l2i
r2a3l2í
r2a3l2o
r2a3l2ó
r2a3l2ô
r2a3l2u
r2a3l2ú
r2a3l4h2
r2a3m2á
r2a3m2â
r2a3m2ã
r2a3m2e
r2a3m2é
r2a3m2ê
r2a3m2i
r2a3m2í
r2a3m2o
r2a3m2ó
r2a3m2ô
r2a3m2õ
r2a3m2u
r2a3m2ú
r2a3n2a
r2a3n2á
r2a3n2ã
r2a3n2e
r2a3n2é
r2a3n2ê
r2a3n2i
r2a3n2í
r2a3n2o
r2a3n2ó
r2a3n2ô
r2a3n2u
r2a3n2ú
r2a3n4h2
r2a3o
r2a3ô
r2a3p2
r2a3q42
r2a3r2a
r2a3r2á
r2a3r2ã
r2a3r2e
r2a3r2é
r2a3r2ê
r2a3r2i
r2a3r2í
r2a3r2o
r2a3r2ó
r2a3r2u
r2a3s2a
r2a3s2á
r2a3s2â
r2a3s2ã
r2a3s2e
r2a3s2é
r2a3s2ê
r2a3s2h2
r2a3s2i
r2a3s2í
r2a3s2o
r2a3s2ó
r2a3s2ô
r2a3s2õ
r2a3s2u
r2a3t2a
r2a3t2á
r2a3t2â
r2a3t2ã
r2a3t2e
r2a3t2é
r2a3t2ê
r2a3t2i
r2a3t2í
r2a3t2o
r2a3t2ó
r2a3t2ô
r2a3t2õ
r2a3t2u
r2a3t2ú
r2a3t2y
r2a3t4l2
r2a3t4r2
r2a3ú2l2
r2a3ú2n2
r2a3v2
r2a3va
r2a3x2
r2a3y
r2a3y2a
r2a3z
r2a4l.
r2a4m.
r2a4s.
r2ar3c2
r2ar3d2
r2ar3g2
r2ar3m2
r2ar3q4
r2ar3r2
r2ar3s2
r2ar3t2
r2e
r2é
r2ê
r2é3n4
r2e4m.
r2e4n6s.
r2i
r2í
r2o
r2ô
r2õ4
r2ow1
r2s1d2
r2ú
r3s2é1n
r4a
r4s1b2
r4s1c2
r4s1f2
r4s1j2
r4s1k2
r4s1m2
r4s1p2
r4s1q4
r4s1s2
r4s1t2
r4s1z2
s2e4m.
s2e4n6s.
s2h2
s2í
s3j
s3t2
s3t2é1n2
s3v2
t2é3n2u
t2e4m.
t2é4m.
t2e4n6s.
t2é4n6s.
u1á
u1ã
u1b2a
u1b2á
u1b2â
u1b2ã
u1b2e
u1b2é
u1b2i
u1b2í
u1b2o
u1b2ó
u1b2ô
u1b2u
u1b2ú
u1c2a
u1c2á
u1c2â
u1c2ã
u1c2e
u1c2é
u1c2ê
u1c2i
u1c2í
u1c2o
u1c2ó
u1c2ô
u1c2u
u1c2ú
u1c2y
u1c4h2
u1c4l2
u1c4r2
u1é
u1ê
u1e4m.
ú1e4m.
u1e4n6s.
ú1e4n6s.
u1g2a
u1g2á
u1g2â
u1g2ã
ú1g2a
u1g2e
u1g2é
u1g2ê
ú1g2e
u1g2i
u1g2í
ú1g2i
u1g2o
u1g2ó
u1g2ô
ú1g2o
u1g2u
u1g2ú
ú1g2u
u1g4l2
u1g4r2
ú1g4r2
u1í
u1l2a
u1l2á
u1l2â
u1l2ã
ú1l2a
u1l2e
u1l2é
u1l2ê
ú1l2e
u1l2i
u1l2í
ú1l2i
u1l2o
u1l2ó
u1l2ô
ú1l2o
u1l2õ4
u1l2u
u1l2ú
ú1l2u
u1l4h2
ú1l4h2
u1m2a
u1m2á
u1m2â
u1m2ã
ú1m2a
u1m2e
u1m2é
u1m2ê
ú1m2e
u1m2i
u1m2í
ú1m2i
u1m2o
u1m2ó
u1m2ô
u1m2u
u1m2ú
ú1m2u
u1n2a
u1n2á
u1n2â
u1n2ã
ú1n2a
u1n2e
u1n2é
ú1n2e
u1n2i
u1n2í
ú1n2i
u1n2o
u1n2ó
u1n2ô
ú1n2o
u1n2u
u1n2ú
ú1n2u
u1n4h2
ú1n4h2
u1r2a
u1r2á
u1r2â
u1r2ã
u1r2e
u1r2é
u1r2ê
u1r2i
u1r2í
u1r2o
u1r2ó
u1r2ô
u1r2õ4
u1r2u
u1r2ú
u1r2y
u1s2a
u1s2á
u1s2â
u1s2ã
ú1s2a
u1s2e
u1s2é
u1s2ê
ú1s2e
u1s2i
u1s2í
ú1s2i
u1s2o
u1s2ó
u1s2ô
ú1s2o
u1s2u
u1s2ú
u1s4h2
u1z2a
u1z2á
u1z2â
u1z2ã
u1z2e
u1z2é
u1z2ê
u1z2i
u1z2í
u1z2o
u1z2ó
u1z2ô
u1z2u
u1z2ú
u2a
u2b1c2
u2b1d2
u2b1f2
u2b1g2
u2b1j2
u2b1m2
u2b1n2
u2b1p2
u2b1q4
u2b1s2
u2b1t2
u2b1v2
u2b1z2
u2bl
u2br
u2c1c2
u2c1ç2
u2c1m2
u2c1n2
u2c1s2
u2c1t2
u2c1z2
u2e
u2g1b2
ú2g1b2
u2g1d2
u2g1g2
u2g1h2
u2g1m2
u2g1n2
u2g1t2
u2i
u2l1b2
ú2l1b2
u2l1c2
u2l1ç2
ú2l1c2
u2l1d2
ú2l1d2
u2l1f2
ú2l1f2
u2l1g2
ú2l1g2
u2l1l2
u2l1m2
ú2l1m2
u2l1n2
u2l1p2
ú2l1p2
u2l1q4
u2l1r2
u2l1s2
u2l1t2
ú2l1t2
u2l1v2
ú2l1v2
u2l1x2
u2l1z2
u2m1b2
ú2m1b2
u2m1h2
u2m1l2
u2m1m2
u2m1n2
ú2m1n2
u2m1p2
ú2m1p2
u2m1t2
u2m1z2
u2n1b2
u2n1c2
u2n1ç2
ú2n1c2
u2n1d2
ú2n1d2
u2n1f2
ú2n1f2
u2n1g2
ú2n1g2
u2n1j2
ú2n1j2
u2n1k2
u2n1l2
u2n1n2
u2n1q4
ú2n1q4
u2n1r2
u2n1s2e
u2n1s2é
u2n1s2i
ú2n1s2i
u2n1s2o
u2n1t2
u2n1v2
ú2n1v2
u2n1x2
u2n1z2
ú2n1z2
ú2n3s.
u2n4s.
u2n4s1c2
u2n4s1d2
u2n4s1f2
u2n4s1p2
u2n4s1t2
u2n4s1v2
u2o
u2r1b2
u2r1c2
u2r1ç2
u2r1d2
u2r1f2
u2r1g2
u2r1h2
u2r1j2
u2r1k2
u2r1l2
u2r1m2
u2r1n2
u2r1p2
u2r1q4
u2r1s2
u2r1t2
u2r1v2
u2r1z2
u2r3r2
u2s1b2
u2s1c2
ú2s1c2
u2s1d2
u2s1f2
u2s1g2
u2s1j2
u2s1l2
u2s1m2
ú2s1m2
u2s1n2
ú2s1n2
u2s1p2
ú2s1p2
u2s1q4
ú2s1q4
u2s1r2
u2s1t2
ú2s1t2
u2s1v2
u2s1z2
u2s3s2
ú2s3s2
u2z1b2
u2z1l2
u2z1m2
u2z1z2
ú3b2
ú3c2
u3d2
ú3d2
u3f2
u3j2
u3p2
ú3p2
u3q4
ú3r2
u3t2
ú3t2
u3u
u3v2
ú3v2
u3x2
u5é2n4s
v2é3n4
v2e4m.
v2e4n6s.
w2a
x1s
x2e4m.
x2e4n6s.
y2a
z2e4m.
z2e4n6s.
z4í
